Idaho, session 2025, S1017.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-512D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-512D. SELF-DIRECTED LEARNER DESIGNATION. (1) A student attending
public school in Idaho shall be eligible to be designated as a self-directed
learner. For the purposes of this section, a "self-directed learner" means a
full-time student:
(a) Who demonstrates mastery of content knowledge through grades, as-
sessments, or mastery-based learning rubrics;
(b) Whose teacher or teachers designate the student as such. The
teacher may consider the student's mastery of the content, academic
growth, timeliness for assignments, self-motivation, ability to estab-
lish goals, and reaching age-appropriate learning outcomes;
(c) Who, starting in grade 5, demonstrates mastery of addition and mul-
tiplication for numbers 0-10, as well as related subtraction and divi-
sion problems, known collectively as "math facts"; and
(d) Who, starting in grade 8, demonstrates an informed choice of post-
secondary career and education goals by:
(i) Completing and updating his student learning plan as defined
in section 33-1001(30), Idaho Code;
(ii) Supplementing his student learning plan, as applicable, with
the following that further his postsecondary goals:
1. Extended learning opportunities as defined in section
33-6401, Idaho Code;
2. Courses and examinations funded in pursuant to chapter
46, title 33, Idaho Code; or
3. Any other credits or programs permitted under Idaho Code
or district policy as applicable to the student's learning
plan; and
(iii) Identifying and writing down self-determined personal life
goals, including an explanation of how attending specific classes
will lead to the fulfillment of personal life goals.
(2) Each school district or public charter school may adopt a self-di-
rected learner policy to provide processes:
(a) Through which students may seek a self-directed learner designa-
tion;


(b) By which teachers may designate a student as a self-directed
learner;
(c) To monitor and support self-directed learners;
(d) By which a student's teacher or teachers rescind the self-directed
learner designation; and
(e) As otherwise necessary for implementation.
(3) Once a student is designated a self-directed learner, the student
has the right to flexible learning. Flexible learning may be different for
each student and may include flexible attendance, attending school virtu-
ally, extended learning opportunities, and any other agreed-upon learning
inside or outside the classroom. Starting in grade 8, flexible learning
should further the student's progress toward postsecondary goals. Any flex-
ible learning permitted under this section must be agreed upon by the stu-
dent, his teacher or teachers, and the student's parents or legal guardian.
(4) In order to remain a self-directed learner, the student must meet
criteria agreed upon by him, his teacher or teachers, and his parents or le-
gal guardian. Criteria may include continued mastery of content knowledge
and skills, academic growth, progress toward postsecondary goals, or other
measures of student learning. If a student fails to meet the agreed-upon
criteria or fails to stay current on classroom assignments, and does not cure
the failure within an agreed-upon time frame, the building administrator
shall rescind the self-directed learner designation upon recommendation by
the teacher or teachers.
(5) A self-directed learner will be reported as enrolled as one (1.0)
FTE or in attendance for a full day in school for the purpose of calculat-
ing support units and public school funding. The district or charter school
will receive full funding for its self-directed learners, regardless of at-
tendance or actual hours of instruction up to one (1) full day of attendance
or one (1.0) FTE, or the remaining day or FTE if the student is shared between
two (2) or more school districts or public charter schools.
(6) The parents or legal guardians of a self-directed learner may
request reimbursement from the school district or public charter school
that the student is attending for expenses incurred by the parents or legal
guardians that are directly related to the right to flexible learning under
subsection (3) of this section and that are directly related to the criteria
to remain a self-directed learner under subsection (4) of this section. The
total reimbursement amount shall not exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of
the public school funding received by the school district or public charter
school pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. School districts and pub-
lic charter schools shall develop a policy regarding the submission of and
deadlines for requests for reimbursement pursuant to this subsection.
(6) (7) Each school district or public charter school must report the
number of self-directed learners to the state department of education annu-
ally.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.